Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 19
WESTERN STATES TRANSPORTATION AGREEMENT

Sec.

§ 49-1901. Enactment of Western States Transportation Agreement.

The Western States Transportation Agreement is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein as follows:

ARTICLE I

ARTICLE II

ARTICLE III

ARTICLE IV

ARTICLE V

ARTICLE VI

ARTICLE VII

SECTION 2. The provisions of this agreement shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this agreement is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating jurisdiction or the applicability thereto to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this agreement shall not be affected thereby. If this agreement shall be held contrary to the constitution of any jurisdiction participating herein, the agreement shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining jurisdictions and in full force and effect as to the jurisdictions affected as to all severable matters.
ARTICLE VIII

ARTICLE IX

ARTICLE X

§ 49-1902. Existing statutes not repealed.

All existing statutes prescribing weight and size standards and all existing statutes relating to special permits shall continue to be of force and effect until amended or repealed by law.

§ 49-1903. State government departments authorized to cooperate with cooperating committee.

Within appropriations available therefor, the departments, agencies and officers of the government of this state may cooperate with and assist the cooperating committee within the scope contemplated by article IV, section 1(a) and (b) of the agreement. The departments, agencies and officers of the government of this state are authorized generally to cooperate with that cooperating committee.

§ 49-1904. Filing of reports.

Filing of reports as required by article IV, section 4, of the agreement shall be with the department. Any and all notices required by the cooperating committee by-laws shall be given to the designated representative of this state or his alternate, if any.

§ 49-1905 — 49-1912. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-1913, 49-1914. Definitions — Constitutionality — Separability. [Repealed.]